Utah statutes.
58-68-803.   Medical records -- Electronic records.

(1)  Medical records maintained by a licensee shall:

(a)  meet the standards and ethics of the profession; and

(b)  be maintained in accordance with division rules made in collaboration with the board.

(2)  Medical records under this section may be maintained by an electronic means if the records comply with Subsection (1).

